District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.22

Rulemaking.

Pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title, the Mayor is authorized to issue any rules that may be necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter, which shall include a fee to cover the administrative costs of processing a BID application and holding a public hearing. No delay in issuing any rules beyond 120 days after May 29, 1996, shall prevent an applicant from filing an application with the Mayor, or prevent the Mayor from registering a BID.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 22, 43 DCR 1684
renumbered as § 23, Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-26, § 2, 44 DCR 4320

Expiration of Law 11-134

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1215.01.

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-89, June 19, 1997, 44 DCR 3747), and § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-146, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 5054).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-23, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5762).
1981 Ed., § 1-2292.